Washington statutes.
RCW 19.60.062

Attorney fees and costs in action to recover possession or determine title or ownership.

By either party, in an action brought by an owner to recover goods in the possession of a pawnbroker or secondhand dealer, or an action brought by a pawnbroker or secondhand dealer against an owner, or a person claiming ownership, to determine title or ownership of any item, the prevailing party is entitled to reasonable attorney's fees and costs.

[ 1991 c 323 s 9; 1984 c 10 s 11; 1979 ex.s. c 41 s 1.]